Utah statutes.
58-1-405.   Provisions of volunteer health or veterinary services -- Division authority.

In accordance with Section 26-49-205, the division may pursue actions against a volunteer health practitioner operating under Title 26, Chapter 49, Uniform Emergency Volunteer Health Practitioners Act.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 2008 General Session

